apertium-fin-eng.fin.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<np%>   ! Proper noun
%<vblex%> ! lexical verb
%<vaux%> ! Auxliary verb
%<adj%> ! adjective
%<adv%> ! adverb
%<prn%> ! pronoun
%<pr%> ! adposition
%<post%> ! adposition
%<ij%> ! Interjection
%<cnjcoo%> ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%> ! Sub-ordinating conjunction
%<sent%> ! Sentence-ending punctuation	 e.g. full stop, question mark
%<num%> ! Numeral

%<sg%> ! Singular
%<pl%> ! Plural

%<ant%> ! Anthroponym
%<pers%> ! Personal
%<mf%> ! Masc/Fem
%<m%> ! Masculin
%<f%> ! Feminin
%<nt%> ! Neuter

%<nom%>	 !Nominative
%<acc%>	 !Accusative
%<par%>	 !Partitive
%<gen%>	 !Genitive
%<ine%> !inessive
%<ela%> ! elative
%<ill%> ! illative
%<ade%> ! adessive
%<abl%>	 !Ablative
%<all%> ! allative
%<ins%>	 !Instructiv
%<tra%>	 ! Translative
%<abe%> ! abessive
%<com%> ! comitative
%<actv%> ! Active voice
%<pasv%> ! Passive voice
%<pres%> !Present
%<past%> !Past
%<imp%> !Imperative
%<inf%> !Infinitive
%<pp%>  !Past participle
%<pprs%> ! present pcp
%<cni%> !Conditional
%<neg%> !Negative
%<conneg%> !...
%<px1sg%> !First person singular possessive
%<px2sg%> !Second person singular possessive
%<px1pl%> !First person plural possessive
%<px2pl%> !Second person plural possessive
%<px3sp%> ! Third person possessive
%<p1%> ! First person
%<p2%> ! Second person
%<p3%> ! Third person
%<impers%> ! Impersonal
%<pst%> ! Positive
%<comp%> ! Comparative	wikipedia
%<sup%> ! Sup

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)


%+

%{A%}
%{O%}
%{U%}

LEXICON Root

0 Nouns   ;
0 Verbs   ;
0 Pron  ;
0   Adjectives  ;
0   Adverbs ;
0   Adpositions ;
0   Conjunctions    ;
0   Propers ;
0   Numerals ;
0   Punctuation ;
0   Interjections ;

LEXICON PROPN_MARI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:i  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:i N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:e N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:e N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:e N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON PROPN_JAAKKO

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ko  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ko%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:o N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ko N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ko N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_ON ;
0:o N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ko N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ko N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:ko N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:ko N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON PROPN_HANS
%<sg%>%<nom%>: N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:i%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:i N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:e N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:e N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:e N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_LEIKKIMINEN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:nen N_POSSES? ;
0:se N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:se N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:se N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:s N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:s N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:s N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:s N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_SÄÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:t%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_HAN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_TUOLI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:i  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:i%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:i N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:e N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:e N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:e N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_ÄÄNI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:i  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:t%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:e N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_ÄITI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ti  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ti%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>%<px3sp%>:ti%{A%}%{A%}n N_CLITS? ;
0:di N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ti N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ti N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:de N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:te N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:te N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:t N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:te N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_VUOSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:si  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:tt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:de N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:te N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:te N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:s N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:s N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:s N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:s N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_TYTTÖ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:tö  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:tö%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:ö N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:tö N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:tö N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_ON ;
0:ö N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:tö N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:tö N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:tö N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:tö N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_PUU

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{U%}  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:%{U%}t%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:%{U%} N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:%{U%} N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:%{U%} N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_HUN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_POIKA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ika  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ika%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:ja N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ika N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ika N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:j N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ik N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ik N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:ik N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ik N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_TALO

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0  N_POSSES? ;
0 N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0 N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0 N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_ON ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_LINTU

%<sg%>%<nom%>:tu  N_POSSES? ;
0:nu N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:tu N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:tu N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_UN ;
0:nu N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:tu N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:tu N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:tu N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:tu N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_RANTA
%<sg%>%<nom%>:ta N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:taa N_POSSES? ;
0:na N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ta N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ta N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:na N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ta N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:to N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:to N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:to N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_LEIKKI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ki  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ki%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:i N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ki N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ki N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ke N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ke N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:k N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ke N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:psi  N_POSSES? ;
0:pse N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:pse N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:pse N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ps N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ps N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ps N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:ps N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ps N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_KÄSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:si  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<nom%>:tt%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:de N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:te N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:te N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:s N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:s N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:s N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:s N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_VASTAUS

%<sg%>%<nom%>:s  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<nom%>:st%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:kse N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:kse N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:kse N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ks N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_TARHA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:a N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:a N_POSSES? ;
0:a N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:a N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:a N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:o N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:o N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:o N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:o N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:o N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_IKKUNA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:a  N_POSSES? ;
0:a N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:a N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:a N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:o N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:o N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:o N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:o N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0:o N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON Nouns
hilla%<n%>:hill N_TARHA ; ! "cloudberry"
ihminen%<n%>:ihmi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "hyman"
ikkuna%<n%>:ikkun N_IKKUNA ; ! "window"
kissa%<n%>:kiss N_TARHA ; ! "cat"
koti%<n%>:ko N_ÄITI ; ! "home"
kysymys%<n%>:kysymy N_VASTAUS ; ! "question"
käsi%<n%>:kä N_KÄSI ; ! "hand"
lapsi%<n%>:la N_LAPSI ; ! "child"
laskeminen%<n%>:laskemi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "counting"
leikki%<n%>:leik N_LEIKKI ; ! "play"
leikkiminen%<n%>:leikkimi N_LEIKKIMINEN ; ! "play"
lintu%<n%>:lin N_LINTU ; ! "bird"
lupaus%<n%>:lupau N_VASTAUS ; ! "promise"
maa%<n%>:ma N_SÄÄ ; ! "earth"
maili%<n%>:mail N_TUOLI ; ! "mile"
marja%<n%>:marj N_TARHA ; ! "berry"
matka%<n%>:matk N_TARHA ; ! "distance, travel"
piilo%<n%>:piilo N_TALO ; ! "house"
poika%<n%>:po N_POIKA ; ! "boy"
puu%<n%>:pu N_PUU ; ! "tree"
puutarha%<n%>:puutarh N_TARHA ; ! "garden"
pää%<n%>:pä N_SÄÄ ; ! "tree"
ranta%<n%>:ran N_RANTA ; ! "coast"
sisko%<n%>:sisko N_TALO ; ! "sister"
syy%<n%>:sy N_PUU ; ! "tree"
sää%<n%>:sä N_SÄÄ ; ! "weather"
talo%<n%>:talo N_TALO ; ! "house"
tunturi%<n%>:tuntur N_TUOLI ; ! "fell"
tuoli%<n%>:tuol N_TUOLI ; ! "chair
tyttö%<n%>:tyt N_TYTTÖ ; ! "girl"
vaari%<n%>:vaar N_TUOLI ; ! "grandpa"
vastaus%<n%>:vastau N_VASTAUS ; ! "answer"
vesi%<n%>:ve N_KÄSI ; ! "water"
vuosi%<n%>:vuo N_VUOSI ; ! "year"
äiti%<n%>:äi N_ÄITI ; ! "mother"
ääni%<n%>:ään N_ÄÄNI ; ! "voice"
saari%<n%>:saar N_ÄÄNI ; ! "island"
kivi%<%>:kiv N_ÄÄNI ;
vaimo%<n%>:vaimo N_TALO ; ! "wife"
vatsa%<%>:vats N_TARHA ;
varis%<%>:vari N_VASTAUS ;
